Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,211
Resignation of registered agent
of foreign corporation.

(MBCA
15.09) (a) The registered agent of a foreign corporation may resign the agency
appointment by signing and delivering to the Secretary of State for filing
the signed original and two exact or conformed copies of a statement of resignation.
The statement of resignation may include a statement that the registered office
is also discontinued.

(b) After filing the statement,
the Secretary of State shall attach the filing receipt to one copy and mail
the copy and receipt to the registered office if not discontinued. The Secretary
of State shall mail the other copy to the foreign corporation at its principal
office address shown in its most recent biennial report.

(c) The agency appointment
is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the
thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 211.